Vermont, session 2025-2026, H267.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 33 V.S.A. chapter 18, subchapter 3 is added to read:
Subchapter 3. Vermont Hospital Security Plan
§ 1841. PURPOSE
The purposes of this subchapter are to provide all Vermonters with access
to and coverage for health care services delivered in hospitals and to provide
an opportunity to reduce hospital billing processes and other unnecessary
administrative costs. The General Assembly recognizes that the health care
VT LEG #380517 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.267
2025 Page 2 of 11
system is in crisis and that most Vermonters do not have the financial ability to
pay for increasing health insurance premiums or for the rising costs of health
care. Vermonters need access to hospital care, regardless of insurance
coverage or ability to pay. In addition, the State must seek the financial
sustainability of the health care system, including reducing health care
spending and transaction costs. The General Assembly recognizes that health
care reform is needed to provide coverage of essential health care services to
Vermonters.
§ 1842. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Agency” means the Agency of Human Services.
(2) “Board” means the Green Mountain Care Board.
(3) “Health care services” means services for the diagnosis, prevention,
treatment, cure, or relief of a physical or mental health condition, including
counseling, procedures, products, devices, and medications.
(4) “Hospital” has the same meaning as in 18 V.S.A. § 1902 and may
also include hospitals located outside Vermont.
(5) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Human Services.
(6) “Vermont resident” means an individual who is domiciled in
Vermont as evidenced by an intent to maintain a permanent dwelling place in
VT LEG #380517 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.267
2025 Page 3 of 11
Vermont indefinitely and to return to Vermont if temporarily absent, coupled
with an act or acts consistent with that intent.
§ 1843. VERMONT HOSPITAL SECURITY PLAN
(a)(1) The Agency of Human Services or designee shall administer the
Vermont Hospital Security Plan to provide Vermont residents with access to
and coverage for health care services received in a hospital and for payments to
hospitals for health care services provided.
(2) Vermonters who are eligible for or are enrolled in a publicly funded
health care program shall be eligible for coverage of any benefits provided by
the Vermont Hospital Security Plan that are not covered by the publicly funded
health care program. As used in this subdivision, “publicly funded health care
program” means Medicare, Medicaid, Dr. Dynasaur, VPharm, another
Medicaid-waiver program, or any other program providing health benefits that
is funded in whole or in part with federal funds.
(b) The Vermont Hospital Security Plan shall:
(1) provide each hospital in this State with a negotiated annual payment
based on the budget of the individual hospital for health care services provided
by that hospital to all patients, including patients who are not Vermont
residents;
(2) provide for the collection of payments for health care services
provided by hospitals in this State to patients who are not Vermont residents,
VT LEG #380517 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.267
2025 Page 4 of 11
which may be carried out by the Agency or by a third-party administrator
under contract with the Agency for this purpose; and
(3) provide for payments to out-of-state hospitals for health care
services delivered to Vermont residents.
(c) The Agency shall establish by rule income-sensitized deductibles, co-
payments, an annual hospital care fee, or other cost-sharing amounts and
mechanisms applicable to the Vermont Hospital Security Plan established by
this subchapter.
(d) A beneficiary aggrieved by an adverse decision of the Agency may
appeal to the Human Services Board pursuant to 3 V.S.A. § 3090.
(e) Vermont residents receiving health care services at a hospital shall not
be balance billed or otherwise charged for receiving the services except to the
extent of any applicable cost-sharing amounts established by the Agency by
rule.
§ 1844. GLOBAL HOSPITAL BUDGETS
(a)(1) Annually, the Green Mountain Care Board, in collaboration with the
Secretary of Human Services, shall develop a global hospital budget for the
State and individual hospital budgets for each hospital located in Vermont. In
developing the global hospital budget, the Board shall consider the Health
Resource Allocation Plan developed pursuant to 18 V.S.A. § 9405, the hospital
budget review process set forth in 18 V.S.A. § 9456, the negotiated global
VT LEG #380517 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.267
2025 Page 5 of 11
hospital payments established under section 1845 of this title, and all other
revenue received by Vermont hospitals.
(2) The Board shall report its recommended global hospital budget for
the State to the General Assembly on or before January 15 for the following
fiscal year. The global hospital budget shall not take effect until it has been
approved or modified by an act of the General Assembly.
(b)(1) The global hospital budget for the State shall serve as a spending cap
within which hospital costs may be controlled, resources directed, and quality
and access assured. The global hospital budget shall limit the total annual
growth of hospital costs to the Consumer Price Index plus 3.5 percent.
(2) The Board shall ensure that its review of individual hospital budgets
under 18 V.S.A. chapter 221, subchapter 7 and its review of certificate of need
requests under 18 V.S.A. chapter 221, subchapter 5 are consistent with the
global hospital budget.
(c) The Board shall adopt rules establishing the standards and procedures
necessary to implement this section.
§ 1845. NEGOTIATED GLOBAL HOSPITAL PAYMENTS
(a) The Secretary shall negotiate with hospitals for a global hospital
payment for health care services provided by the Vermont Hospital Security
Plan. The payment amount shall be based on the global hospital budget
developed pursuant to section 1844 of this title and other information
VT LEG #380517 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.267
2025 Page 6 of 11
necessary to the determination of the appropriate payment amount, including
all other revenue received by a hospital from other sources.
(b) The Secretary shall adopt rules establishing the standards and
procedures necessary to implement this section.
§ 1846. VERMONT HOSPITAL SECURITY TRUST FUND
(a) The Vermont Hospital Security Trust Fund is established as a special
fund for the purpose of financing health care services provided by hospitals to
beneficiaries of the Vermont Hospital Security Plan.
(b) Into the Fund shall be deposited:
(1) transfers from the General Fund authorized by the General
Assembly;
(2) proceeds from grants, donations, contributions, taxes, and any other
sources of revenue as may be provided by statute or rule;
(3) transfers of all federal receipts related to health care services
provided by hospitals, including all Medicaid receipts and, upon federal
approval, all Medicare receipts; and
(4) revenue for the sources established to fund the Vermont Hospital
Security Plan established in this subchapter.
(c) The Secretary shall administer the Fund in accordance with 32 V.S.A.
chapter 7, subchapter 5, except that all interest earned on Fund balances shall
VT LEG #380517 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.267
2025 Page 7 of 11
be credited to the Fund. The Secretary shall maintain records indicating the
amount of money in the Fund at any time.
(d) All monies received by or generated to the Fund shall be used only for
the administration and delivery of health care services provided by hospitals
participating in State health care assistance programs administered by the
Agency, including the Vermont Hospital Security Plan.
Sec. 2. 18 V.S.A. § 9437 is amended to read:
§ 9437. CRITERIA
A certificate of need shall be granted if the applicant demonstrates that the
project serves the public good and the Board finds:
(1) The proposed project aligns with statewide health care reform goals
and principles because the project:
(A) takes into consideration health care payment and delivery system
reform initiatives;
(B) addresses current and future community needs in a manner that
balances statewide needs, if applicable; and
(C) is consistent with appropriate allocation of health care resources,
including appropriate utilization of services, as identified in the Health
Resource Allocation Plan developed pursuant to section 9405 of this title; and
VT LEG #380517 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.267
2025 Page 8 of 11
(D) is consistent with the financial parameters set by the global
hospital budget established pursuant to 33 V.S.A. § 1844, to the extent
applicable.
* * *
Sec. 3. 18 V.S.A. § 9456(c) is amended to read:
(c) Individual hospital budgets established under this section shall:
(1) be consistent with the Health Resource Allocation Plan;
(2) take into consideration national, regional, or in-state peer group
norms, according to indicators, ratios, and statistics established by the Board;
(3) promote efficient and economic operation of the hospital;
(4) reflect budget performances for prior years;
(5) include a finding that the analysis provided in subdivision (b)(9) of
this section is a reasonable methodology for reflecting a reduction in net
revenues for non-Medicaid payers; and
(6) demonstrate that they support equal access to appropriate mental
health care that meets standards of quality, access, and affordability equivalent
to other components of health care as part of an integrated, holistic system of
care; and
(7) be consistent with the global hospital budget established pursuant to
33 V.S.A. § 1844.
VT LEG #380517 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.267
2025 Page 9 of 11
Sec. 4. VERMONT HOSPITAL SECURITY PLAN SPECIAL
COMMITTEE; FUNDING MECHANISMS; REPORT
(a) There is created the Vermont Hospital Security Plan Special Committee
to recommend to the General Assembly appropriate funding mechanisms for
the Vermont Hospital Security Plan.
(b) The Special Committee shall be composed of the following members:
(1) two members of the House of Representatives, one from the House
Committee on Health Care and one from the House Committee on Ways and
Means, appointed by the Speaker of the House;
(2) two members of the Senate, one from the Senate Committee on
Health and Welfare and one from the Senate Committee on Finance, appointed
by the President Pro Tempore;
(3) the Secretary of Human Services or designee;
(4) the Chair of the Green Mountain Care Board or designee; and
(5) the Commissioner of Taxes or designee.
(c) Powers and duties. The Special Committee shall consider how to fund
the Vermont Hospital Security Plan with and without federal waivers to secure
the participation of Medicaid and Medicare, including at least the following
funding sources:
(1) an income tax;
(2) a payroll tax;
VT LEG #380517 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.267
2025 Page 10 of 11
(3) premiums or cost-sharing mechanisms;
(4) a value-added tax; and
(5) an annual hospital care fee or other consumption tax.
(d) Assistance. For purposes of scheduling meetings and preparing
recommended legislation, the Special Committee shall have the assistance of
the Office of Legislative Operations, the Office of Legislative Counsel, and the
Joint Fiscal Office.
(e) Report. On or before January 15, 2026, the Special Committee shall
provide its recommendation on funding the Vermont Hospital Security Plan to
the General Assembly.
(f) Meetings.
(1) The member of the House Committee on Health Care shall call the
first meeting of the Special Committee to occur on or before July 1, 2025.
(2) The Special Committee shall select a chair from among its members
at the first meeting.
(3) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.
(4) The Special Committee shall cease to exist on January 15, 2026.
(g) Compensation and reimbursement. For attendance at meetings during
adjournment of the General Assembly, the legislative members of the Special
Committee shall be entitled to per diem compensation and reimbursement of
VT LEG #380517 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.267
2025 Page 11 of 11
expenses pursuant to 2 V.S.A. § 23 for not more than six meetings. These
payments shall be made from monies appropriated to the General Assembly
Sec. 5. FEDERAL WAIVERS
(a) Not later than July 1, 2025, the Secretary of Human Services shall apply
for a federal Medicare waiver to allow the State to include Medicare funds for
hospital services in the Vermont Hospital Security Trust Fund established by
33 V.S.A. § 1846 and to modify the payment standards or amounts in order to
include Medicare funds in the global hospital budget established pursuant to 33
V.S.A. § 1844.
(b) Not later than July 1, 2025, the Secretary of Human Services shall
apply for a federal Medicaid waiver to allow the State to modify the payment
standards or amounts in order to include Medicare funds in the global hospital
budget established pursuant to 33 V.S.A. § 1844.
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATES
This act shall take effect on passage, with the Vermont Hospital Security
Plan implemented not later than January 1, 2027.
VT LEG #380517 v.1